en: cereal extrudate
de: Getreideextrudat
fr: extrudat de céréales
it: estruso di cereal

en: hydrolysed cereal, hydrolysed cereals
bg: хидролизирани зърнени храни
cs: hydrolyzované cereálie
da: hydrolyseret korn
de: hydrolysiertes Getreide
es: cereal hidrolizado, cereales hidrolizados
fi: hydrolysoitu vilja, hydrolysoidut viljat
fr: céréales hydrolysées
hr: hidrolizirane žitarice
hu: hidrolizált gabona, hidrolizált gabonafélék
it: cereali idrolizzati, idrolizzato di cereali
nl: gehydrolyseerd graan, gehydrolyseerde granen
pl: zboża hydrolizowane, hydrolizowane zboża
pt: cereal hidrolisado, cereais hidrolisados
ro: cereale hidrolizate
sk: hydrolyzované obilniny
sv: hydrolyserat spannmål, hydrolyserade spannmål

en: cereal flakes
de: Getreideflocken, Kornflockenmischung
es: copos de cereales
fi: viljahiutaleet
fr: flocons de céréales
hr: pahuljice od žitarica
it: fiocchi di cereali
nl: graanvlokken
pl: płatki zbożowe
pt: flocos de cereais
ro: fulgi de cereale
ru: хлопья из зерна
sv: spannmålsflingor

en: crispy flakes
it: fiocchi croccanti
sv: krispiga flingor

en: wholemeal cereal flakes
de: Getreidevollkornflocken, Vollkornflocken
fi: täysjyvähiutaleet, täysjyvähiutale
fr: flocons de céréales complètes
hr: pahuljice od integralnih žitarica
it: fiocchi di cereali integrali
ro: fulgi de cereale integrale
sv: fullkornsflingor

en: cereal and seed mixture
de: Getreide- und Saatenmischung, Getreide-Saaten-Mischung, Getreide-Saatenmischung, Körner-und Getreidemischung
es: mezcla de cereales y semillas, mix de cereales y semillas
hr: mješavina žitarica i sjemenki
it: miscela di cereali e semi

en: cereal with cocoa
hr: žitarica s kakaom
it: cereali con cacao

en: cereal crispies
de: Getreide Crispies
fi: viljamuro
fr: crispies de céréales, céréales croustillantes
hr: hrskavice od žitarica
hu: gabonapehely, gabonapelyhek
it: crispies di cereal

en: crunchy cereals
de: knusprige Cerealien
el: Τραγανοί κόκκοι δημητριακών
es: cereales crujientes
hr: hrskave žitarice
it: Cereali croccante

en: sorghum, jowar
de: Sorghumhirsen
es: sorgo
fr: sorgho
hr: sirak
hu: cirok
it: sorgo
la: Sorghum bicolor, Sorghum vulgare
nl: kafferkoren, sorghum, sorgum
pl: sorgo
sk: cirok

en: sorghum flour
de: Sorghummehl, Sorghum-Mehl
es: harina de sorgo, harina de maicillo
fr: Farine de sorgho, farine de sorgho
hr: sirkovo brašno
it: farina di sorgo
nl: sorghummeel

en: whole sorghum flour, whole grain sorghum flour
de: Sorghumvollkornmehl, Sorghum-Vollkornmehl
fr: Farine complète de sorgo/Farine complète de sorgho
hr: brašno od cijelog sirka
it: farina di sorgo integrale

en: triticale
xx: triticale
de: Triticale
pl: pszenżyto, pszenżyta

en: whole grain triticale
de: Vollkorntriticale, Vollkorn-Triticale
es: triticale integral
hr: tritikale od cijelog zrna
it: triticale integrale

en: whole grain triticale flour, whole-grain triticale flour
de: Triticalevollkornmehl, Triticale-Vollkornmehl
es: harina integral de triticale
hr: brašno od cijelog zrna tritikalea
it: farina di triticale integrale

en: wheat
af: koring
am: ስንዴ
an: trigo
ar: قمح
as: গম
az: buğda
ba: бойҙай
be: пшаніца
bg: пшеница, пшенично
bh: गोहूँ
bn: গম
bo: གྲོ།
br: gwinizh
bs: pšenica
ca: blat
ce: кӏа
cs: pšenice
cv: тулă
cy: gwenith
da: hvede
de: Weizen, Weizenart, weizen art
dv: ގޮދަން
el: σιτάρι
es: trigo
et: nisu
eu: gari
fa: گندم
fi: vehnä, vehnät, vehnästä, vehnää
fj: Witi
fo: hveiti
fr: blé, froment
ga: cruithneacht
gl: trigo
gn: avati mirĩ
gu: ઘઉં
he: חיטה
hi: गेहूँ
hr: pšenica, pšenicu, pšenične, pšenični
ht: ble
hu: búza
hy: ցորեն
ia: tritico
id: gandum
ii: ꅪ
ik: palauvakstrat
io: frumento
is: hveiti
it: frumento, grano
ja: コムギ, 小麦
jv: gandhum
kk: бидай, bïdaý, استىق
kn: ಗೋಧಿ
ko: 밀
ky: буудай
lb: weess
li: weit
lt: kvieciu, kvietys, kviečiai, kviečlų
lv: kvieši, kviešu
mg: varimbazaha
mk: пченица
ml: ഗോതമ്പ്
mn: улаан буудай
mr: गहू
ms: pokok gandum
mt: qamħ
my: ဂျုံ
nb: hvete
ne: गहुँ
nl: tarwe
nn: kveite
no: hvete
nv: tłʼoh naadą́ą́ʼ
oc: blat
or: qamadii
os: мæнæу
pa: ਕਣਕ
pl: pszenica, pszenicy, pszenicę, pszenna, pszenne, pszenny, pszenicą
ps: غنم
pt: trigo
ro: grâu, grau
ru: пшеница
sa: ऋचेयुः
sd: ڪڻڪ
sh: pšenica
si: තිරිඟු
sk: pšenica
sl: pšenica, psenicni
sn: gorosi
so: qamadi
sq: gruri
sr: пшеница
su: tarigu
sv: vete
sw: ngano
ta: கோதுமை
te: గోధుమ
tg: гандум
th: ข้าวสาลี
tl: trigo
tr: buğday, bugday
tt: бодай
ug: بۇغداي
uk: пшениця
ur: گندم
uz: bugʻdoy
vi: lúa mì
wa: frumint
yi: ווייץ
zh: 小麦

en: sprouted wheat
de: Weizensprossen, Weizenkeimlinge
fr: Blé germé
hr: proklijala pšenica
it: germogli di grano, grano in germogli
pl: kiełki pszenicy

en: cooked wheat
de: Vorgegarter Hartweizen
fi: kypsennetty vehnä
fr: blé précuit à la vapeur
hr: kuhana pšenica
hu: előfőzőtt búza
it: grano cotto

en: wheat grain
bg: пшенични зърна, пшенично зърно
de: weizenkörner
es: grano de trigo
fi: vehjänjyvä, vehnänjyvät
fr: grains de blé
hr: zrno pšenice
sv: vetekorn

en: whole wheat kernels
da: fuldkornshvedekerner
sv: fullkornskärnor av vete